Idaho statutes. Title 63 REVENUE AND TAXATION
Chapter 39
TAX ON NEWLY CONSTRUCTED AND OCCUPIED
RESIDENTIAL AND COMMERCIAL
STRUCTURES

Sec.

§ 63-3901 — 63-3912. Statement of intent — Imposition of tax — Amount — Exemptions — Reporting — Notice of tax due — Distribution of funds — Penalties and interests — Offset — Lien — Appeals — Administration. [Repealed.]